Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2309
Permitholder; reports.

The department may require, by general or special order, a permitholder under the Domesticated Cervine Animal Act to file with the department, on such forms as prescribed, regular or special reports or answers, in writing, to specific questions for the purpose of furnishing information concerning any activity undertaken. Special reports shall be made under oath and filed within thirty days.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 8.